Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 8

Supervised Winding Up and Termination

48-245-801. Supervised winding up and termination following a nonjudicial dissolution.

After an event of dissolution has occurred and before a certificate of termination has been issued, the LLC or, for good cause shown, a member or creditor may apply to a court within the county in which the registered office of the LLC is situated to have the dissolution conducted or continued under the supervision of the court as provided in part 9 of this chapter.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.